Hawaii statutes.
§171-25 Irrigation projects. In any
patent, agreement, or lease a condition may be provided requiring the inclusion
of the land being disposed in any irrigation project formed or to be formed by
the state agency responsible therefor and making the land subject to
assessments made or to be made for such project and constituting such
assessments a first lien upon the land which if not paid shall result in the
forfeiture of the land subject to notice of default as provided in section
171-20. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-25; HRS §171-25]

Cross References

Assessments and
liens, see §174-19.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next